Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 824.016 is amended to read:
824.016. (1) The State Rail Rehabilitation Fund is established as an account  in the General Fund
of the State Treasury. All moneys in  the account are appropriated continuously to the Department
of Transportation for expenditures for any or all of the following:
(a) Acquisition of a railroad line.
(b) Rehabilitation or improvement of rail properties.
(c) Planning for rail services.
(d) Any other methods of reducing the costs of lost rail service in this state.
(e) Rail projects, including:
(A) Capacity improvements, such as:
(i) New or lengthened sidings;
(ii) Industrial spur rehabilitation; and
(iii) Industrial spur construction;
(B) Capital investments that improve safety; and
(C) Capital investments that reduce greenhouse gases.
(f) Providing state matching funds to leverage  federal discretionary grant funding for rail
projects.
(2) The program developed by the Department of Transportation under  this section to provide
funds [for rail projects ] shall include:
[(a) Development of a formula for determining a minimum cost  to benefit ratio necessary for project
funding;]
[(b) Supervision and monitoring of railroad acquisitions and  the awarding of rehabilitation con-
tracts;]
[(c) Continuing inspection of all railroad rehabilitation projects; and ]
[(d) Auditing financial records of all railroad acquisition and rehabilitation projects. ]
(a) Development of a methodology for prioritizing funding  that takes into consideration
an applicant’s ability to use funding sources to leverage federal discretionary grant funding
for rail projects.
(b) A  requirement that rail projects selected are projects that are consistent with the
goals of the Oregon State Rail Plan.
Enrolled Senate Bill 16 (SB 16-A) Page 1
(3) The Department of Transportation shall provide funds [ for railroad projects ] under this sec-
tion only with the approval of the Oregon Transportation Commission.
(4) The department may use moneys in  the fund to pay the department’s administrative
costs associated with the fund and with carrying out the provisions of this section.
(5) Not later than December 31 of  each even-numbered year, the department shall report,
in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the Joint Committee on  Transportation regarding
the expenditures of moneys in the fund and the status of rail projects  that have received
moneys from the fund.
SECTION 2. (1) The amendments  to ORS 824.016 by section 1 of this 2023 Act become
operative on January 1, 2024.
(2) The Department of  Transportation may take any action before the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section  that is necessary for the department to carry out,
on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, the amendments
to ORS 824.016 by section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate April 17, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House April 25, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 16 (SB 16-A) Page 2